Maine, session 132, LD2156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Allocation to Treasurer of State. The $5,000,000 of the state ceiling on
private activity bonds for calendar year 2026 previously allocated to the Treasurer of State
remains allocated to the Treasurer of State to be used or reallocated in accordance with the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363, subsection 5 for calendar year 2026. Five
million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2027 is allocated to the Treasurer of
State to be used or reallocated in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsection 5.
Sec. 2. Allocation to Finance Authority of Maine, including as successor to
Maine Educational Loan Authority. The $235,000,000 of the state ceiling on private
activity bonds for calendar year 2026 previously allocated to the Finance Authority of
Maine, including as successor to the Maine Educational Loan Authority, remains allocated
to the Finance Authority of Maine to be used or reallocated in accordance with the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and 8 for calendar year 2026. An
additional $100,000,000 of the state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year
2026, of which $47,625,000 was previously unallocated and $52,375,000 was previously
allocated to the Maine State Housing Authority, is allocated to the Finance Authority of
Maine to be used or reallocated in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and
8 for calendar year 2026. One hundred twenty-five million dollars of the state ceiling for
calendar year 2027 is allocated to the Finance Authority of Maine to be used or reallocated
in accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsections 6 and 8.
Sec. 3. Allocation to Maine Municipal Bond Bank. The $10,000,000 of the
state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2026 previously allocated to the
Maine Municipal Bond Bank remains allocated to the Maine Municipal Bond Bank to be
used or reallocated in accordance with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363,
subsection 7 for calendar year 2026. Ten million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar
year 2027 is allocated to the Maine Municipal Bond Bank to be used or reallocated in
accordance with Title 10, section 363, subsection 7.
Page 1 - 132LR2614(07)

Sec. 4. Allocation to Maine State Housing Authority. The $100,000,000 of
the state ceiling on private activity bonds for calendar year 2026 previously allocated to the
Maine State Housing Authority is reduced to $47,625,000, and the remaining $52,375,000
is reallocated to the Finance Authority of Maine, for use or reallocation in accordance with
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 10, section 363, subsection 4 for calendar year 2026.
Two hundred fifty million dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2027 is allocated to
the Maine State Housing Authority to be used or reallocated in accordance with Title 10,
section 363, subsection 4.
Sec. 5. Unallocated state ceiling. Zero dollars of the state ceiling on private
activity bonds for calendar year 2026 is unallocated. Seven million six hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars of the state ceiling for calendar year 2027 is unallocated and must be
reserved for future allocation in accordance with applicable laws.
Page 2 - 132LR2614(07)